test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-k47_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:
  Noun - : # k_
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Indef: sonur
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Indef: son
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Indef: [syni, soni]
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Indef: sonar
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Indef: synir
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Indef: synir
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Indef: [sonum, synum]
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Indef: sona
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Nom+Def: sonurin
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Acc+Def: sonin
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Dat+Def: [syninum, soninum]
    sonur+N+Msc+Sg+Gen+Def: sonarins
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Nom+Def: synirnir
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Acc+Def: synirnar
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Dat+Def: [sonunum, synunum]
    sonur+N+Msc+Pl+Gen+Def: sonanna
